test/src/morphology/N-ueue29_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - üü: # Noun (29) üü 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     üü+N+Sg+Nom: üü
     üü+N+Sg+Gen: üü
     üü+N+Sg+Par: üüd
     üü+N+Sg+Ill: [üühte, üühe]
     üü+N+Pl+Gen: öie
     üü+N+Pl+Par: öid
     üü+N+Pl+Ill: [öihte, öihe]
     üü+N+Pl+All: öile
